Illinois, session 104th, HB5576.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regional Transportation Authority Act is 5amended by changing Section 2.01d as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 3615/2.01d)7    Sec. 2.01d. ADA Paratransit Fund. 8    (a) The Authority shall establish an ADA Paratransit Fund 9and, each year, deposit into that Fund the following amounts: 10(i) a base amount equal to $115,000,000 in 2012, and, each year 11thereafter, an amount equal to the final budgeted funding for 12ADA paratransit services for the current year, (ii) any funds 13received from the State pursuant to appropriations for the 14purpose of funding ADA paratransit services, and (iii) any 15additional funds necessary to fund the budget or amended 16budget for ADA paratransit services adopted or approved by the 17Board for the current year. The amounts on deposit in the Fund 18and interest and other earnings on those amounts shall be used 19by the Authority to make grants to the Suburban Bus Board for 20ADA paratransit services provided pursuant to plans approved 21by the Authority under Section 2.30 of this Act. Funds 22received by the Suburban Bus Board from the Authority's ADA 23Paratransit Fund shall be used only to provide ADA paratransit   HB5576- 2 -LRB104 20189 RTM 33640 b1services to individuals who are determined to be eligible for 2such services by the Authority under the Americans with 3Disabilities Act of 1990 and its implementing regulations. 4Revenues from and costs of services provided by the Suburban 5Bus Board with grants made under this Section shall be 6included in the Annual Budget and Two-Year Financial Program 7of the Suburban Bus Board and shall be subject to all budgetary 8and financial requirements under this Act that apply to ADA 9paratransit services. Beginning in 2008, the Executive 10Director shall, no later than August 15 of each year, provide 11to the Board a written determination of the projected annual 12costs of ADA paratransit services that are required to be 13provided pursuant to the Americans with Disabilities Act of 141990 and its implementing regulations for the current year. 15The Authority shall conduct triennial financial, compliance, 16and performance audits of ADA paratransit services to assist 17in this determination.18    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 19Authority may not withdraw moneys from the ADA Paratransit 20Fund unless the Authority:21        (1) implements a program to collect data about the 22    reliability of paratransit services that evaluates each 23    driver's performance;24        (2) requires regular training sessions, including 25    training to assist visually impaired and deaf riders 26    traveling door-to-door, for drivers who received poor   HB5576- 3 -LRB104 20189 RTM 33640 b1    evaluations under paragraph (1);2        (3) requires every method that allows a rider to use a 3    service provided by the Authority to allow caregivers to 4    reserve rides for visually impaired and deaf riders.5(Source: P.A. 97-399, eff. 8-16-11.)